North Carolina, session 2025, SB511.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 7B of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 7. Instructional Requirements.
"§ 115C-76.80. Instructional requirements.
Each public school unit shall provide instruction pursuant to the requirements of this Part.
"§ 115C-76.85. Informational literacy.
(a) As used in this section, the term "informational literacy" means a set of skills that
enable an individual to recognize when information is needed and to locate, evaluate, and use the
needed information effectively. Informational literacy includes, but is not limited to, digital,
visual, media, textual, and technological literacy.
(b) The State Board of Education shall adopt standards for age-appropriate instruction on
informational literacy for kindergarten through grade 12. The standards shall include at least the
following:
(1) The research process and how information is created and reproduced.
(2) Critical thinking skills and how to use information resources.
(3) Methods of research, including the difference between primary and secondary
sources.
(4) The differences between facts, points of view, and opinions.
(5) How to access peer-reviewed print and digital library resources.
(6) The economic, legal, and social issues surrounding the use of information.
(7) The ethical production of information.
(c) Public school units shall consult with library/media personnel when developing
curriculum for the informational literacy standards."
SECTION 1.(b) Part 1 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-81.67. Informational literacy.
Each local board of education shall develop and implement informational literacy instruction
consistent with the requirements of G.S. 115C-76.80."
SECTION 1.(c) Article 4 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 116-69.05. Informational literacy.
*S511-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The school shall provide instruction in informational literacy consistent with
G.S. 115C-76.80."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 116-235(a1) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(1a) The Board of Trustees shall ensure that instruction in informational literacy
consistent with G.S. 115C-76.80 is included in the standard course of study
for the School."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 511-First Edition